Massachusetts, session 194th, S922.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 7C of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting the
following new section:-
Section 74. The division shall ensure that all dining halls, cafeterias, canteens and similar
facilities that are owned, operated or contracted by public institutions of higher education or
executive offices, departments, divisions, centers, agencies or authorities of the commonwealth
shall offer one or more plant-based protein sources at every meal they serve; provided, however,
that this section shall not apply to facilities that are under contract prior to the effective date of
this section until the contract expires or is terminated, renegotiated or renewed.
SECTION 2. Chapter 15A of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after
section 47 the following new section:-
Section 48. All culinary arts degree and certificate programs offered by public institutions
of higher education shall provide instruction concerning: (i) the health, climate, and
of 5

environmental benefits of maintaining a diet that involves protein sources that are exclusively,
predominantly or partially plant-based; and (ii) how to integrate plant-based protein sources into
a healthy diet and prepare healthy meals that involve protein sources that are exclusively,
predominantly or partially plant-based.
SECTION 3. Chapter 19A of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting the
following new section:-
Section 45. In administering senior nutrition programs, including the hot lunch program
described in section 37, the department shall ensure that every program participant receiving
home-delivered meals has the ability to request and receive meals that reflect the participant’s
preference for a diet that involves protein sources that are exclusively, predominantly or partially
plant-based, and that every program provider serving congregate meals shall offer one or more
plant-based protein sources at every meal the program provider serves.
SECTION 4. Section 65 of chapter 23A of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby
amended, in subsection (a), by inserting after the word “options” the following words:-
“, including plant-based protein sources,”
SECTION 5. Said section 65 of said chapter 23A is hereby further amended by striking
subsection (d) and inserting in place thereof the following subsection:-
(d) The community development financial institution shall work in conjunction with
local community colleges and vocational education institutions to develop programs designed to
train and educate food sellers respecting the designating and marketing of nutritious foods,
including plant-based protein sources, and to assist in the development of public education
of 5

programs designed to make the buying public aware of the need for nutritious foods and the
identity of nutritious foods, including the health, climate, and environmental benefits of
maintaining a diet that involves protein sources that are exclusively, predominantly or partially
plant-based.
SECTION 6. Said section 65 of said chapter 23A is hereby further amended, in
subsection (h), by inserting after the word “food” the following words:-
“, including plant-based protein sources,”
SECTION 7. Chapter 69 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting the
following new section:-
Section 38. (a) The Office for Food and Nutrition Programs within the department shall
offer, on at least an annual basis, voluntary training and resources concerning plant-based protein
sources to schools and other organizations participating in the National School Lunch Program
or the Child Adult Food Care Program. Said training and resources shall provide information
including but not be limited to: (i) the health, climate, and environmental benefits of maintaining
a diet that involves protein sources that are exclusively, predominantly or partially plant-based;
and (ii) how to integrate plant-based protein sources into a healthy diet and prepare healthy
meals that involve protein sources that are exclusively, predominantly or partially plant-based.
(b) In awarding all grants, including but not limited to the School Nutrition Equipment
Assistance Grant for Schools, MA Farming Reinforces Education and Student Health, and the
Summer Food Service Program, said Office for Food and Nutrition Programs shall give positive
weight to applications that will: (i) increase access to meals involving plant-based protein
sources; or (ii) increase awareness of the health, climate, and environmental benefits of
of 5

maintaining a diet that involves protein sources that are exclusively, predominantly or partially
plant-based.
SECTION 8. Chapter 74 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting the
following new section:-
Section 59. All culinary arts programs approved by the commissioner pursuant to section
2 of this chapter shall provide instruction concerning: (i) the health, climate, and environmental
benefits of maintaining a diet that involves protein sources that are exclusively, predominantly or
partially plant-based; and (ii) how to integrate plant-based protein sources into a healthy diet and
prepare healthy meals that involve protein sources that are exclusively, predominantly or
partially plant-based.
SECTION 9. Section 5 of chapter 111I of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out the second paragraph and inserting in place
thereof the following paragraph:-
A monthly food package shall be provided to each participant and shall be prescribed by
a competent professional authority at the local WIC program based solely on the participant's
dietary needs; provided that in prescribing such monthly food package, the competent
professional authority shall consider the health benefits of maintaining a diet that involves
protein sources that are exclusively, predominantly or partially plant-based. Such competent
professional authorities shall be allowed to choose from the full range of types and amounts of
food authorized by federal rules in developing food packages for program participants. Program
participants shall have the right to request and receive a food package that reflects the
of 5

participant’s preference for a diet that involves protein sources that are exclusively,
predominantly or partially plant-based.
SECTION 10. The department of elementary and secondary education shall, by not later
than July 1, 2027, update the Comprehensive Health and Physical Education Framework to
include standards concerning: (i) how to maintain a healthy diet that involves protein sources that
are exclusively, predominantly or partially plant-based; (ii) the health, climate, and
environmental benefits of maintaining a diet that involves protein sources that are exclusively,
predominantly or partially plant-based.
of 5